sv: ram: Rullram; Fyrkantsram; Snäppram; Spännram; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta okvira za križni bod: Okvir s namotavanjem; Pravokutni okvir; Snap okvir; Okvir od letvica za napinjanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de moldura para ponto cruz: Bastidor de enrolar; Bastidor slate; Bastidor de encaixe (snap); Bastidor tensor; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta okvirja za križni vbod: Okvir za navijanje; Okvir iz letev; Zaskočni okvir; Okvir z napenjalnimi letvicami; Drugo
ru: Тип пялец для вышивки крестиком: Рама-скролл; Рама с планками; Рама-снап; Подрамник; Другое
es: Tipo de bastidor de punto de cruz: Bastidor de desplazamiento; Bastidor cuadrado; Bastidor a presión; Bastidor de barras tensoras; Otro
vi: Loại khung thêu chữ thập: Khung cuộn; Khung bảng; Khung chốt; Khung thanh căng; Khác
fi: Ristipistokehyksen tyyppi: Rullakehys; Pingotuskehys; Pikakehys; Kiilakehys; Muu
da: Type broderiramme: Rulleramme; Slate-ramme; Snap-ramme; Blændramme; Andet
en: Cross-stitch frame type: Scroll frame; Slate frame; Snap frame; Stretcher bar frame; Other
bg-BG: Тип рамка за кръстат бод: Рамка за навиване; Рамка от летви; Закопчаваща се рамка; Рамка с обтягащи пръти; Други
nb: Ramme for korssting: Rulleramme; Spennramme; Snap-ramme; Blindramme; Annet
nl: Kruissteekframe type: Rolframe; Borduurraam; Klikframe; Spieraam; Overig
hu: Keresztöltéses hímzőkeret típusa: Tekerőkeret; Négyszögletes hímzőkeret; Pattintható keret; Feszítőkeret; Egyéb
tr: Kanaviçe kasnağı tipi: Sarma çerçeve; Sabit çerçeve; Geçmeli çerçeve; Germe çıtası çerçevesi; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de moldura para ponto de cruz: Bastidor de enrolar; Bastidor de ardósia; Bastidor de pressão; Bastidor com barras de esticamento; Outro
ko: 십자수 프레임 유형: 스크롤 프레임; 슬레이트 프레임; 스냅 프레임; 스트레처 바 프레임; 기타
ja: クロスステッチFrameタイプ: スクロールフレーム; スレートフレーム; スナップフレーム; ストレッチャーバーフレーム; その他
zh-TW: 十字繡框類型: 捲軸繡架; 方繡架; 卡扣繡架; 繃布架; 其他
de: Art des Kreuzstichrahmens: Rollrahmen; Rechteckiger Stickrahmen; Schnapprahmen; Keilrahmen; Sonstige
th: ประเภทกรอบปักครอสติช: สะดึงแบบม้วน; สะดึงแบบกระดาน; สะดึงแบบประกอบ; สะดึงแบบไม้ขึง; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος πλαισίου σταυροβελονιάς: Τελάρο τυλίγματος; Τελάρο slate; Τελάρο με κλιπ; Τελάρο με πηχάκια; Άλλο
fr: Type de cadre pour point de croix: Cadre à rouleau; Métier à broder; Cadre à pression; Cadre à barres d’étirement; Autre
pl: Typ ramy do haftu krzyżykowego: Rama z wałkami; Rama prostokątna; Ramka zatrzaskowa; Rama z krosnem; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de cadru pentru cusătură în cruce: Cadru cu role; Cadru fix (slate); Cadru cu prindere rapidă (snap); Cadru tip șasiu; Altele
it: Frame per punto croce: Telaio avvolgibile; Telaio a listelli; Telaio a scatto; Telaio con listelli tenditela; Altro
cs: Typ vyšívacího rámečku pro křížkový steh: Rolovací rám; Vyšívací rám; Zacvakávací rám; Napínací rám; Ostatní
zh-CN: 十字绣绷布类型: 卷轴绣架; 板式绣架; 按扣绣架; 绷框; 其他
lt-LT: Kryžminio siuvinėjimo rėmo tipas: Ritininis rėmas; Skersinis rėmas; Užspaudžiamas rėmas; Įtempimo juostų rėmas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ rámu pre krížikovú výšivku: Rolovací rám; Obdĺžnikový vyšívací rám; Zaklapávací rám; Rám s napínacími lištami; Iné